Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Medicaid................................  $ 3,785,711,528
(2) Behavioral health..................  $ 647,963,491
(3) Health policy and
analytics................................ $ 85,081,744
(4) Public health......................... $ 280,069,549
(5) Oregon State Hospital ........... $ 980,046,486
(6) Central services .................... $ 106,539,104
(7) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 247,388,457
(8) Capital improvement............. $ 852,816
(9) Debt service .......................... $ 63,134,651
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco
tax receipts, marijuana tax receipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and  Medicare
receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Medicaid................................  $ 5,411,501,971
(2) Behavioral health..................  $ 315,229,998
(3) Health policy and
analytics................................ $ 134,184,623
(4) Behavioral health - ARPA:
(a) Behavioral health
workforce - ARPA ................. $ 10,667,722
(b) Behavioral health
housing - ARPA .................... $ 64,795,910
(5) Public health......................... $ 350,656,937
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 1
(6) Drug treatment and
recovery services .................. $ 209,030,671
(7) Oregon State Hospital ........... $ 15,914,608
(8) Central services .................... $ 6,746,488
(9) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 34,520,367
(10) Shared administrative
services ................................. $ 295,026,552
(11) Capital improvement............. $ 852,816
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Medicaid................................ $ 3,519,334
(2) Behavioral health.................. $ 14,500,159
(3) Health policy and
analytics................................ $ 28,211
(4) Central services .................... $ 250,004
(5) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 555,218
(6) Debt service .......................... $ 16,513,581
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans behavioral
health.................................... $ 2,879,455
(2) Veterans dental
services ................................. $ 3,519,334
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds, excluding federal funds described in  section 2 of this 2025
Act, collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the following purposes:
(1) Medicaid................................ $22,372,719,148
(2) Behavioral health.................. $ 300,008,798
(3) Health policy and
analytics................................ $ 57,584,877
(4) Public health......................... $ 457,232,818
(5) Oregon State Hospital ........... $ 32,441,418
(6) Central services .................... $ 37,529,740
(7) State assessments and
enterprise-wide costs ............ $ 75,328,430
SECTION 6. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the following  expenditures by the
Oregon Health Authority are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Women, Infants and Children Program infant  formula rebate
system.
(2) Expenditures from the federal funds  Women, Infants and Children Program food
voucher redemptions.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,907,137,415 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board from the Public Employees’
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 2
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,244,863,726 is established for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit
for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board from the Oregon Educators
Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and self-insurance.
SECTION 9. (1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2025, out of the General
Fund, the amount of  $5,000,000, to be allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for Oregon
State Hospital operational challenges.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2026, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 10. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 3